test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-igae33_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - igä: # Noun (33) igä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     igä+N+Sg+Nom: igä
     igä+N+Sg+Gen: iä
     igä+N+Sg+Par: ikä
     igä+N+Sg+Ill: ikkä
     igä+N+Sg+Ine: [iän, iäh, iähn]
     igä+N+Sg+Ela: iäst
     igä+N+Sg+All: iäle
     igä+N+Sg+Ade: iäl
     igä+N+Sg+Abl: iält
     igä+N+Sg+Tra: iäs
     igä+N+Sg+Ter: iäniq
     igä+N+Sg+Abe: iäldäq
     igä+N+Sg+Com: [iägaq, iäga]
     igä+N+Pl+Nom: iäq
     igä+N+Pl+Gen: iki
     igä+N+Pl+Par: iki
     igä+N+Pl+Ill: [ikkihe, ikki, ikkide]
     igä+N+Pl+Ine: [ikin, ikih, ikihn]
     igä+N+Pl+Ela: ikist
     igä+N+Pl+All: ikile
     igä+N+Pl+Ade: ikil
     igä+N+Pl+Abl: ikilt
     igä+N+Pl+Tra: ikis
     igä+N+Pl+Ter: ikiniq
     igä+N+Pl+Abe: [ikildäq, ikildä]
     igä+N+Pl+Com: ikigaq
